Utah statutes.
16-16-504.   No liability as member for association's obligations.
Unless the articles of organization otherwise provide, a debt, obligation, or
other liability of a limited cooperative association is solely that of the
association and is not the debt, obligation, or liability of a member solely
by reason of being a member.
